District of Columbia statutes.
29-1203.05

No creditor rights in trust property.

A creditor of a beneficial owner or trustee shall not obtain possession of, or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to, the property of a statutory trust or any series thereof.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 305 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.